Utah statutes.
16-13-8.   Board of directors -- Number and election of members.
The board of directors of a development corporation shall be of such number in
multiples of three, but not less than six, as shall be determined in the first
instance by the articles of incorporation and thereafter annually by the
stockholders of the corporation. The names and addresses of the members of the
first board of directors shall be stated in the articles of incorporation.
Said persons shall hold office until the first annual meeting of the
corporation and until their successors have been elected and qualified. At the
first annual meeting of a development corporation and at each annual meeting
thereafter, or, if no annual meeting shall be held in any year at the time
fixed by the bylaws, at a special meeting held in lieu thereof, the
shareholders shall elect the directors. The directors shall hold office until
the next annual meeting, after their elections, and until their successors are
elected and qualified unless sooner removed.
Any vacancy in the office of a director shall be filled by the remaining
directors.
